Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1405DP.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1405DP (3) 91
as/js

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 124.204, subsection 2, Code 2025, is
amended by adding the following new paragraphs:
NEW PARAGRAPH. cq. 2-methyl-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-
yl)-N-phenylbutanamide. Other name: alpha’-Methyl butyryl
fentanyl.
NEW PARAGRAPH. cr. N-(1-(2,5-
dimethoxyphenethyl)piperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylpropionamide. Other
name: 2’,5’-Dimethoxyfentanyl.
NEW PARAGRAPH. cs. N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-
phenylfuran-3-carboxamide. Other name: 3-Furanyl fentanyl.
NEW PARAGRAPH. ct. 3-methyl-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-
yl)-N-phenylbutanamide. Other name: Isovaleryl fentanyl.
NEW PARAGRAPH. cu. N-(3-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-
phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)propionamide. Other name: meta-
Fluorofentanyl.
NEW PARAGRAPH. cv. N-(3-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-
phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)isobutyramide. Other name: meta-
Fluoroisobutyryl fentanyl.
NEW PARAGRAPH. cw. N-(2-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-
phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)furan-2-carboxamide. Other name:
ortho-Fluorofuranyl fentanyl.
NEW PARAGRAPH. cx. N-(4-methoxyphenyl)-N-(1-
phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)furan-2-carboxamide. Other name:
para-Methoxyfuranyl fentanyl.
NEW PARAGRAPH. cy. N-(4-methylphenyl)-N-(1-
phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)cyclopropanecarboxamide. Other name:
para-Methylcyclopropyl fentanyl.
NEW PARAGRAPH. cz. 1-(2-methyl-4-(3-phenylprop-2-en-1-
yl)piperazin-1-yl)butan-1-one. Other name: 2-Methyl AP-237.
NEW PARAGRAPH. da. 2-(2-(4-ethoxybenzyl)-1H-
benzimidazol-1-yl)-N,N-diethylethan-1-amine. Other names:
etodesnitazene; etazene.
NEW PARAGRAPH. db. 2-(4-ethoxybenzyl)-5-nitro-1-(2-
(pyrrolidin-1-yl)ethyl)-1H-benzimidazole. Other names: N-
pyrrolidino etonitazene; etonitazepyne.
LSB 1405DP (3) 91
-1- as/js 1/6

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
NEW PARAGRAPH. dc. N,N-diethyl-2-(5-nitro-2-(4-
propoxybenzyl)-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine. Other name:
protonitazene.
Sec. 2. Section 124.204, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended
by adding the following new paragraphs:
NEW PARAGRAPH. cn. N-(1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-
oxobutan-2-yl)-1-butyl-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide. Other name:
ADB-BUTINACA.
NEW PARAGRAPH. co. 4-methyl-1-phenyl-2-(pyrrolidin-1-
yl)pentan-1-one. Other name: alpha-PiHP.
NEW PARAGRAPH. cp. 2-(methylamino)-1-(3-
methylphenyl)propan-1-one. Other names: 3-MMC; 3-
methylmethcathinone.
Sec. 3. Section 124.204, subsection 9, Code 2025, is amended
by adding the following new paragraphs:
NEW PARAGRAPH. o. Methyl 3,3-dimethyl-2-(1-(pent-4-en-
1-yl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamido)butanoate. Other name:
MDMB-4en-PINACA.
NEW PARAGRAPH. p. Methyl 2-[[1-(4-fluorobutyl)indole-
3-carbonyl]amino]-3,3-dimethyl-butanoate. Other names:
4F-MDMB-BUTICA; 4F-MDMB-BICA.
NEW PARAGRAPH. q. N-(1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-
2-yl)-1-(pent-4-en-1-yl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide. Other
name: ADB-4en-PINACA.
NEW PARAGRAPH. r. 5-Pentyl-2-(2-phenylpropan-2-
yl)pyrido[4,3-b]indol-1-one. Other names: CUMYL-PEGACLONE;
SGT-151.
NEW PARAGRAPH. s. Ethyl 2-[[1-(5-fluoropentyl)indole-
3-carbonyl]amino]-3,3-dimethyl-butanoate. Other names:
5F-EDMB-PICA; 5F-EDMB-2201.
NEW PARAGRAPH. t. Methyl 2-(1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-
indole-3-carboxamido)-3-methyl butanoate. Other name: MMB-
FUBICA.
NEW PARAGRAPH. u. N-ethyl-2-(2-(4-isopropoxybenzyl)-5-
nitro-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine, its isomers, esters,
LSB 1405DP (3) 91
-2- as/js 2/6

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers. Other
name: N-desethyl isotonitazene.
NEW PARAGRAPH. v. 2-(4-ethoxybenzyl)-5-nitro-1-(2-
piperidin-1-yl)-1H-benzimidazole, its isomers, esters, ethers,
salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers. Other names:
N-piperidinyl etonitazene; etonitazepipne.
Sec. 4. Section 124.204, subsection 9, paragraphs d, h, and
i, Code 2025, are amended by striking the paragraphs.
Sec. 5. Section 124.208, subsection 6, Code 2025, is amended
by adding the following new paragraphs:
NEW PARAGRAPH. bm. 5[alpha]-androstan-3,6,17-trione.
NEW PARAGRAPH. bn. 6-bromo-androsta-1,4-diene-3,17-
dione.
NEW PARAGRAPH. bo. 6-bromo-androstan-3,17-dione.
NEW PARAGRAPH. bp. 4-chloro-17[alpha]-methyl-androsta-
1,4-diene-3,17[beta]-diol.
NEW PARAGRAPH. bq. 4-chloro-17[alpha]-methyl-androst-
4-ene-3[beta],17[beta]-diol.
NEW PARAGRAPH. br. 4-chloro-17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]-
hydroxy-androst-4-en-3-one.
NEW PARAGRAPH. bs. 4-chloro-17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]-
hydroxy-androst-4-ene-3,11-dione.
NEW PARAGRAPH. bt. 2[alpha],17[alpha]-dimethyl-
17[beta]-hydroxy-5[beta]-androstan-3-one.
NEW PARAGRAPH. bu. 2[alpha],3[alpha]-epithio-
17[alpha]-methyl-5[alpha]-androstan-17[beta]-ol.
NEW PARAGRAPH. bv. estra-4,9,11-triene-3,17-dione.
NEW PARAGRAPH. bw. [3,2-c]furazan-5[alpha]-androstan-
17[beta]-ol.
NEW PARAGRAPH. bx. 18a-homo-3-hydroxy-estra-2,5(10)-
dien-17-one.
NEW PARAGRAPH. by. 4-hydroxy-androst-4-ene-3,17-dione.
NEW PARAGRAPH. bz. 17[beta]-hydroxy-androstano[2,3-
d]isoxazole.
NEW PARAGRAPH. ca. 17[beta]-hydroxy-androstano[3,2-
LSB 1405DP (3) 91
-3- as/js 3/6

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
c]isoxazole.
NEW PARAGRAPH. cb. 3[beta]-hydroxy-estra-4,9,11-trien-
17-one.
NEW PARAGRAPH. cc. 17[alpha]-methyl-androsta-1,4-
diene-3,17[beta]-diol.
NEW PARAGRAPH. cd. 17[alpha]-methyl-5[alpha]-
androstan-17[beta]-ol.
NEW PARAGRAPH. ce. 17[alpha]-methyl-androstan-3-
hydroxyimine-17[beta]-ol.
NEW PARAGRAPH. cf. 6[alpha]-methyl-androst-4-ene-3,17-
dione.
NEW PARAGRAPH. cg. 17[alpha]-methyl-androst-2-ene-
3,17[beta]-diol.
NEW PARAGRAPH. ch. [3,2-c]pyrazole-androst-4-en-
17[beta]-ol.
Sec. 6. Section 124.208, subsection 6, paragraphs a, h, v,
z, aa, am, ay, ba, bb, bc, bk, and bl, Code 2025, are amended
by striking the paragraphs and inserting in lieu thereof the
following:
a. 3[beta],17[beta]-dihydroxy-5[alpha]-androstane.
h. 1-androstenedione (5[alpha]-androst-1-en-3,17-dione).
v. Furazabol (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]-
hydroxyandrostano[2,3-c]furazan).
z. Mestanolone (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]-hydroxy-5[alpha]-
androstan-3-one).
aa. Mesterolone (1[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]-hydroxy-5[alpha]-
androstan-3-one).
am. 17[alpha]-methyl-[Delta]1-dihydrotestosterone
(17[beta]-hydroxy-17[alpha]-methyl-5[alpha]-androst-1-en-3-one)
(also known as 17-[alpha]-methyl-1-testosterone).
ay. Oxandrolone (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]-hydroxy-2-oxa-
5[alpha]-androstan-3-one).
ba. Oxymetholone (17[alpha]-methyl-2-hydroxymethylene-
17[beta]-hydroxy-5[alpha]-androstan-3-one).
bb. Stanozolol (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]-hydroxy-5[alpha]
LSB 1405DP (3) 91
-4- as/js 4/6

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
-androst-2-eno[3,2-c]-pyrazole).
bc. Stenbolone (17[beta]-hydroxy-2-methyl-5[alpha]-androst-
1-en-3-one).
bk. Methasterone (2[alpha],17[alpha]-dimethyl-5[alpha]
-androstan-17[beta]-ol-3-one or 2[alpha],17[alpha]-dimethyl-
17[beta]-hydroxy-5[alpha]-androstan-3-one).
bl. Prostanozol (17[beta]-hydroxy-5[alpha]-androstano[3,2-
c]pyrazole or [3,2-c]pyrazole-5[alpha]-androstan-17[beta]-ol).
Sec. 7. Section 124.210, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended
by adding the following new paragraph:
NEW PARAGRAPH. bh. Zuranolone.
Sec. 8. Section 124B.2, subsection 1, paragraphs y and ad,
Code 2025, are amended to read as follows:
y. Iodine in concentrations greater than 2.2 percent.
ad. N-phenylpiperidin-4-amine(4-anilinopiperidine;
N-phenyl-4-piperidinamine; 4-AP), its amides, its carbamates,
and its halides, its salts, and any combination thereof,
whenever the existence of such is possible.
Sec. 9. Section 124B.6, Code 2025, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 5. A sale, transfer, furnishing, or
receipt of a chemical mixture identified as exempt by federal
regulation.
Sec. 10. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of
immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment.